Montana, session 2025, HB453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 3], the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Cryptocurrency" means a digital or virtual currency that uses cryptography for security,
operates independently of a central authority, and utilizes blockchain or similar technology to record
transactions.
(2) "Third-party payment processor" means an entity that facilitates the acceptance, conversion,
and remittance of cryptocurrency payments to the department of revenue on behalf of a taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Cryptocurrency tax payment program -- rulemaking. (1) The
department of revenue shall establish a program to allow the payment of state income taxes using
cryptocurrency.
(2) The department shall contract with one or more third-party payment processors to facilitate the
acceptance, conversion, and remittance of cryptocurrency payments.
(3) The program must ensure that the state receives all tax payments in United States dollars.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer the program.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 453

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 453.1

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Tax payments using cryptocurrency -- capital gains tax. (1)
Payments of state taxes made using cryptocurrency are not considered a taxable event for the purposes of
determining state capital gains taxation under Title 15, chapter 30.
(2) The department of revenue shall ensure that taxpayers are informed of the provision in
subsection (1).

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 3] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 15, chapter 30, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 30, apply to [sections
1 through 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Applicability. [This act] applies to income tax years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 453